Illinois, session 104th, SB2817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Expanding Medical Residency Opportunities in Illinois Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.8    "Residency program" means a program that is accredited by 9the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or 10the Committee on Postdoctoral Training of the American 11Osteopathic Association or that demonstrates to the Department 12a plan for receiving accreditation for the new graduate 13medical education program. 14    Section 10. Medical residencies; program.15    (a) The Department of Public Health shall, subject to 16appropriation, establish a grant program to provide:17        (1) funding for residency program positions that are 18    not funded by the federal Centers for Medicare and 19    Medicaid Services or other established funding sources; 20    and21        (2) startup funding for entities that wish to 22    establish a residency program.  SB2817- 2 -LRB104 16439 BDA 29831 b1    (b) The Department shall establish a grant application 2process for an entity seeking funding. The application and 3criteria shall be based on health care workforce needs and 4priorities with a focus on increasing access to healthcare in 5rural areas. When funding new residency program positions, 6funding shall be given to programs that strive to:7        (1) graduate individuals who practice in health 8    professional shortage areas in the State;9        (2) locate the positions' main training site in a 10    health professional shortage area; and11        (3) have formal provisions and commitments for 12    residents, post-graduation, to practice in health 13    professional shortage areas in Illinois.14    (c) An entity receiving funding under the program shall 15provide any information requested by the Department that the 16Department determines is necessary to administer this Section.17    (d) Funds shall be awarded to those institutions that best 18demonstrate the ability to provide quality training and to 19retain residents in specific areas of the State where there is 20a recognized unmet priority need for physicians.21    (e) An entity applying for a grant under this Section 22shall submit as part of its application a plan for receiving 23accreditation for the new graduate medical education program. 24The plan shall include a timeline and proof of accreditation 25application, if applicable, along with other information 26requested by the Department as necessary. Entities that fail   SB2817- 3 -LRB104 16439 BDA 29831 b1to achieve accreditation milestones as described in the plan 2may be required to return grant funding at the discretion of 3the Department.4    (f) The Medical Residency Fund is created as a special 5fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund may be used by 6the Department for administrative costs to initiate and 7maintain the demands of the grant program under this Act, to 8expand graduate residency program opportunities in the State, 9and to maximize the delivery of medical care and physician 10services to specific areas of the State where there is a 11recognized unmet priority need for medical care and physician 12services pursuant to this Section. 13    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 14Section 5.1038 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)16    Sec. 5.1038. The Medical Residency Fund.